North Dakota, session 69, SB2388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 19-02.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Ivermectin access.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Ivermectin" means a medication to treat parasitic infections approved by the
federal food and drug administration.
b. "Over-the-counter" means a medication legally sold and purchased without a
prescription.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, ivermectin suitable for human use may be
sold and purchased as an over-the-counter medication in this state.
Page No. 1 25.1370.01000